Oklahoma, session 2025, SB159.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 461 of Title 72, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs shall establish
its headquarters and a veterans resource center in a single location
in Del City, Oklahoma, that provides information and referral
services to connect veterans with available public and private
services.
B. Any state agency that provides any services to veterans
shall collaborate with the Department to provide services through
the veterans resource center established under this section.
C. The Department shall establish a publicly available online
interactive portal for the purpose of supporting public and private
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB159 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

vete ran services. The portal shall include all services available
to veterans in this state.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 462 of Title 72, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created the Oklahoma Unified Veteran
Services Commission, which shall consist of eleven (11) members:
1. One member of the Senate appointed by the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate;
2. One member of the Senate appointed by the Minority Leader of
the Senate;
3. One member of the House of Representatives appointed by the
Speaker of the House of Representatives;
4. One member of the House of Representatives appointed by the
Minority Leader of the House of Representatives;
5. The Secretary of Military and Veterans Affairs or successor
cabinet position;
6. The Director of the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs
or designee;
7. The Commissioner of Mental Health and Substance Abuse
Services or designee;
8. The Executive Director of the Oklahoma Employment Security
Commission or designee;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB159 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

9. The Director of the Oklahoma Department of Career and
Technology Education or designee;
10. The Chancellor of The Oklahoma State System of Higher
Education or designee; and
11. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services or designee.
B. 1. The Commission shall study, evaluate, and make
recommendations for the resources needed and costs associated with
the establishment of the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs
headquarters and a veterans resource center pursuant to Section 1 of
this act.
2. The Commission may collaborate with any state agency that
provides dedicated services to veterans to assess the needs and
costs associated with providing services through the headquarters
and veterans resource center.
C. Staffing for the Commission shall be provided by the Office
of Management and Enterprise Services and the Oklahoma Department of
Veterans Affairs.
D. The reports of the findings of the Commission including, but
not limited to, potential sites, architectural renderings, and
physical or financial evaluation of the proposed facility shall be
made no later than December 31, 2026. The Commission shall
electronically submit reports of its findings to the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB159 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the chair of the standing committee of each house of the Legislature
with primary jurisdiction over military and veteran affairs, and the
chair of the standing committee of each house of the Legislature
with primary jurisdiction over appropriations.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON VETERANS AND MILITARY AFFAIRS
February 13, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS


















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB159 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)